Utah statutes.
41-12a-802.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Account" means the Uninsured Motorist Identification Restricted Account
created in Section 41-12a-806.
(2)  "Database" means the Uninsured Motorist Identification Database created
in Section 41-12a-803.
(3)  "Designated agent" means the third party the department contracts with
under Section 41-12a-803.
(4)  "Division" means the Driver License Division created in Section 53-3-103.
(5)  "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as set forth in Section 41-1a-102.
(6)  "Motor Vehicle Division" means the Motor Vehicle Division of the State
Tax Commission created in Section 41-1a-106.
(7)  "Program" means the Uninsured Motorist Identification Database Program
created in Section 41-12a-803.
